apertium-rus-orv.orv.dix
    <pardef n="v_быти">
      <e><p><l>быти</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>есмь</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еси</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>есть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>есвѣ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>есмъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>есте</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сѫть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>быхъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бы</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бы</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>быховѣ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>быста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>быста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>быхомъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бысте</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бышѧ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧховѣ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧхомъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧсте</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѧхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѫди</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѫди</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѫдѣвѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѫдѣта</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѫдѣмъ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>бѫдѣте</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e lm="быти"><p><l></l><r>быти</r></p><par n="v_быти"/></e>
    <e lm="быти"><p><l>быт</l><r>быти</r></p><par n="v_быти"/></e>
